Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.800

Report—2009 c 432.

The department of labor and industries, the employment security department, and the department of revenue shall coordinate and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of each year on the effectiveness of efforts implemented since July 1, 2008, to address the underground economy. The agencies shall use benchmarks and measures established by the institute for public policy and other measures it determines appropriate.

[ 2009 c 432 s 13.]